Nebraska, session 109, LB378.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
-1-

LB378 LB378
2025 2025
Section 1. (1) For purposes of this section:
(a) Contract means any agreement between a covered institution and a
foreign source for the acquisition by purchase, lease, or barter of
property or services, for the direct benefit or use of either of the
parties;
(b) Covered institution means any public or private two-year or
four-year college or university having a campus or place of business in
Nebraska;
(c) Foreign source means:
(i) A foreign government, including an agency of a foreign
government;
(ii) A legal entity, governmental or otherwise, created solely under
the laws of a foreign government;
(iii) An individual who is not a citizen or a national of the United
States or a trust territory or protectorate thereof; and
(iv) An agent of any entity or individual described in subdivision
(1)(c)(i), (ii), or (iii) of this section, including a subsidiary or
affiliate of a foreign legal entity acting on behalf of any such entity
or individual; and
(d) Reportable funding means any contract, gift, grant, endowment,
award, or donation, payment in exchange for services, capital investment,
salary, wage, compensation fee, or other monetary exchange, including any
pledge, promise, agreement or expressed intention by the foreign source
to provide funding which exceeds fifty dollars in value or is expected to
exceed fifty dollars in value over the projected length of the funding
relationship between the covered institution and the foreign source.
(2)(a) Except as provided in subdivision (b) of this subsection, on
the first day of each calendar quarter, each covered institution shall
provide a report, in a manner prescribed by the Attorney General,
detailing all reportable funding received by the covered institution from
a foreign source during the previous calendar quarter to the Attorney
-2-

LB378 LB378
2025 2025
General and electronically to the Legislature. The report shall include:
(i) The amount of reportable funding received;
(ii) A description of the type of reportable funding and the purpose
for such funding, including whether the reportable funding is part of an
ongoing relationship with the foreign source;
(iii) A detailed description of the foreign source providing the
funding, including the name and address of the entity or individual
providing the funding; and
(iv) A copy of any contract, agreement, pledge, or memorandum of
understanding associated with the funding.
(b) This section shall not require reporting of payments made to a
covered institution by a natural person who would otherwise qualify as a
foreign source for tuition or related fees to support an individual
enrolled or planning to attend at a covered institution.
(c) The Attorney General shall post the report on the Attorney
General's website and such report shall be available to the public.
(3) The Attorney General shall enforce this section. A covered
institution that violates this section may be subject to a civil penalty
imposed by the Attorney General of up to ten thousand dollars for each
violation and forfeiture of any reportable funding received but not
reported.
-3-